California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 mandamus or any other action in court as may be appropriate to ensure that there is no interruption in the provision of benefits to any person eligible therefor under the provisions of this code or the regulations of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 191.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10605.5.

(a) (1) The department, in consultation with counties and labor organizations, shall establish, no later than January 1, 2016, a process to receive voluntary disclosures from social workers, if a social worker has reasonable cause to believe that a policy, procedure, or practice, related to the provision of child welfare services by a county child welfare agency, meets any of the following conditions:

(A) Endangers the
 health or well-being of a child or children.

(B) Is contrary to existing statute or regulation.

(C) Is contrary to public policy.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not disclose to any person or entity the identity of a social worker making a disclosure described in paragraph (1), unless (A) the social worker has consented to the disclosure or (B) there is an immediate risk to the health and safety of a child.

(b) The department shall make available a description of the process established pursuant to subdivision (a) to counties and labor organizations.

(c) For purposes of this section, “county child welfare agency” includes a county welfare department, child welfare department, and any other county agency that employs social workers and is responsible
 for the placement and supervision of children and youth in foster care, including department social workers contracted by counties to perform direct adoption services.

(d) (1) No later than January 1, 2018, the department shall report to the Legislature only the following information:

(A) The total number of relevant disclosures received from social workers, including the month and year the disclosure was received.

(B) A summary description of both of the following:

(i) The issues raised in the disclosures received from a social worker.

(ii) The actions taken by the department in response to the disclosures.

(2) No later than January 1, 2018, the department shall post on its Internet Web site the information described in paragraph (1).

(3) The report required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 768, Sec. 2.   (AB 1978)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10606.

The department shall cause to be published and made available, at no cost to the public, all of its rules and regulations relating to:

(a) The government of the department.

(b) Any form of public assistance for which state aid is granted to the counties or over the administration of which the department has supervision.

The department shall also provide at no cost such subscription service as may be necessary to assure prompt receipt of all additions and amendments to the rules and regulations of the department and digests of decisions compiled under Section 10964.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 109.8.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10606.1.

(a) The department and county welfare departments shall have access to computer information maintained in the files of the Employment Development Department pursuant to Sections 1094 and 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(b) The county shall access the information maintained in the Employment Development Department pursuant to Sections 1094 and 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code to determine if the applicant for, or recipient of, public social services may be eligible for unemployment insurance benefits or disability insurance benefits. If the information reveals that the applicant for, or recipient of, public social services may actually be eligible for a specified amount of weekly unemployment insurance benefits or disability insurance benefits, the county may require the applicant or recipient to make an application for unemployment insurance benefits or disability insurance benefits.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not be construed to require or used as justification for a county to upgrade or change its computer system in order to comply with that subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 544, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10606.2.

(a) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the amendments to this division made by the act that added this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt emergency regulations no later than July 1, 2014. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as or substantially equivalent to an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.

(b) The initial adoption of emergency regulations
 pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations may be adopted.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, for purposes of child welfare services programs and activities described in Divisions 2 and 9 of the
 Welfare and Institutions Code and in Division 13 of the Family Code, the department may, after consultation with counties and other appropriate stakeholders, make rule changes by means of all-county letters of similar instructions from the department pending enactment of state legislation only when necessary to conform to newly enacted federal law and only when both of the following conditions exist:

(A) The newly enacted federal law does not provide for delayed implementation pending state legislation, and existing state law either: (i) is inconsistent with the newly enacted federal law, or (ii) does not address the subject matter associated with the newly enacted federal law.

(B) The rule change is necessary to retain or maximize federal financial participation that is impacted by the newly enacted federal law.

(2) Any all-county letter or similar instruction issued by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall expire 15 months after issuance by the department unless state legislation ratifying the rule changes has been enacted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 73.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10607.

Where the department causes to be published for public distribution informational pamphlets and related materials relating to public assistance programs administered or supervised by the department, they shall be printed in English and may be printed separately in Spanish, or at the discretion of the department, in English and Spanish, in such numbers as the department may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10607.5.

(a) In order to better inform the public as to the range of social services available to aid children and their families, and to provide a concise summary of programs caseworkers may access to aid clients, the State Department of Social Services shall prepare a guide to all programs administered by county departments of social services for children and their families, and that are regulated by the State Department of Social Services. This guide shall include brief descriptions of programs and succinct summaries of their eligibility requirements for all programs available on a statewide basis or in at least two counties. The guide shall not exceed five letter-sized pages. It is not the intent of the Legislature that the guide be a comprehensive training manual for social workers. The guide shall, therefore, be written in language tailored for comprehension by the general public. The guide shall be updated on an annual basis.

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall provide one master copy of the guide, prepared pursuant to subdivision (a), to each county department of social services office that serves children and their families. The State Department of Social Services and county social services departments may make copies of the guide available to members of the public upon request on a fee-for-service basis, provided that the fee shall not exceed the cost of duplication and mailing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1231, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.

Copies of all laws relating to any form of public social service for which state aid is granted to counties, and over the administration of which the department has supervision, and of all bulletins and rules and regulations of the department, shall be made available to the public and for public inspection during regular office hours at each county office administering such aid and in each local or regional office of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.

The department may act as the agent or representative of or cooperate with the federal government in any matters within the scope of the functions of the department, for the administration of federal funds granted to this state or for any other purpose in furtherance of those functions.

The department may cooperate with the federal government, its agencies or instrumentalities, in establishing, extending, and strengthening services for the protection and care of homeless, dependent, and neglected children, and children in danger of becoming delinquent, and may receive and expend all funds made available for such purposes by the federal government to the department, the state, a county, a district, a municipal corporation, or a political subdivision.

Any contract or agreement entered into by the department with the federal government or any agency thereof for the expenditure of any funds in the exercise of any power granted to the department by this section shall be subject to approval by the State Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.3.

(a) By January 1, 1995, the State Department of Social Services shall complete, in consultation with county Independent Living Program administrators, placement agencies, providers, advocacy groups, and community groups, a comprehensive evaluation of the Independent Living Program established pursuant to the federal Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (Public Law 99-272) and develop recommendations available to the public on how independent living services could better prepare foster youth for independence and adulthood.

(b) The department shall investigate alternative transition housing models for youth between the ages of 17 and 18 who are in out-of-home placements under the supervision of the
 county department of social services or county probation department. To the extent federal funds are available and it is in the best interests of the children, the department shall develop and implement a transitional housing model for youth who are preparing for emancipation from foster care.

(c) The department shall also investigate alternative transition models for youth discharged from foster care to live on their own. As part of this investigation, the department shall consider the needs of youth for housing, transportation, health care, access to community resources, employment, and other support services.

(d) The department shall, with the approval of the federal government, amend the foster care state plan, provided for pursuant to Subtitle IV-E (commencing with Section 470) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670, et seq.), and the child welfare services
 state plan (42 U.S.C. Sec. 622), to permit all eligible children be served by the Independent Living Program up to the age of 21 years.

(e) (1) Counties shall maintain a stipend to supplement and not supplant the Independent Living Program. The stipend may provide for, but not be limited to, assisting youth who have exited the foster care system at or after 18 years of age with the following independent living needs:

(A) Bus passes.

(B) Housing rental deposits and fees.

(C) Housing utility deposits and fees.

(D) Work-related equipment and supplies.

(E) Training-related equipment and supplies.

(F) Education-related equipment and
 supplies.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 10101, the state shall pay 100 percent of the nonfederal costs associated with the stipend program in paragraph (1), subject to the availability of funding provided in the annual Budget Act.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 74.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.4.

(a) On or before July 1, 2000, the State Department of Social Services, in consultation with county and state representatives, foster youth, and advocates, shall do both of the following:

(1) Develop statewide standards for the implementation and administration of the Independent Living Program established pursuant to the federal Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (Public Law 99-272).

(2) Define the outcomes for the Independent Living Program and the characteristics of foster youth enrolled in the program for data collection purposes.

(b) Consistent with federal law and reporting requirements, each county
 department of social services shall submit to the department an annual Independent Living Program report, which shall include the following:

(1) An accounting of federal and state funds expended for implementation of the program. A county shall spend no more than 30 percent of federal Independent Living Program funds on housing. Expenditures shall be related to the specific purposes of the program. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, in consultation with counties, shall develop a process for reporting that satisfies federal law and reporting requirements. Program purposes may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Enabling participants to seek a high school diploma or its equivalent or to take part in appropriate vocational training, and providing job readiness training and placement services, or building work experience and marketable
 skills, or both.

(B) Providing training in daily living skills, budgeting, locating and maintaining housing, and career planning.

(C) Providing for individual and group counseling.

(D) Integrating and coordinating services otherwise available to participants.

(E) Providing each participant with a written transitional independent living plan that will be based on an assessment of the participant’s needs, that includes information provided by persons who have been identified by the participant as important to the participant in cases in which the
 participant has been in out-of-home placement for six months or longer from the date the participant entered foster care, consistent with the participant’s best interests, and that will be incorporated into
 their case plan.

(F) Providing participants who are within 90 days of attaining 18 years of age, or older as the state may elect under Section 475(8)(B)(iii) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 675(8)(B)(iii)), including those former foster care youth receiving Independent Living Program Aftercare Services, the opportunity to complete the exit transition plan as required by paragraph (16) of subdivision (f) of Section 16501.1.

(G) Providing participants with other services and assistance designed to improve independent living.

(H) Convening persons who have been identified by the participant as important to
 them for the purpose of providing information to be included in
 their written transitional independent living plan.

(2) Counties shall ensure timely and accurate data entry into the
 statewide child welfare information system for all youth receiving services pursuant to this section.

(3) Counties shall ensure that eligible foster care youth continue to receive information about, and are provided with an opportunity to complete, the National Youth in Transition Database (NYTD) survey, based on an updated process that shall be developed jointly by the department, in consultation with counties to ensure maximum participation in the survey completion and compliance with federal requirements, as follows:

(A) Counties shall provide information to the youth about the NYTD survey within 60 days prior to the date the current or former foster youth is required to be offered the survey.

(B) Within 45 days following the youth in foster care turning 17 years of age,
 counties shall ensure that each youth has an opportunity to complete the NYTD survey as required by federal law.

(C) Counties shall contact the youth who completed the survey at age 17, in order to request that they complete the followup survey before their 19th and 21st birthdays.

(D) Counties shall provide opportunities for current and former eligible foster youth to take the NYTD survey online at child welfare services and probation offices.

(c) The county department of social services in a county that provides transitional housing placement services pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11403.2 shall include in its annual Independent Living Program report a description of currently available transitional housing resources in relation to the number of emancipating pregnant or parenting foster
 youth in the county, and a plan for meeting any unmet transitional housing needs of the emancipating pregnant or parenting foster youth.

(d) In consultation with the department, a county may use different methods and strategies to achieve the standards and outcomes of the Independent Living Program developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) In consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, the California Youth Connection, and other stakeholders, the department shall develop and adopt emergency regulations, no later than July 1, 2012, in accordance with Section 11346.1 of the Government Code that counties shall be required to meet when administering the Independent Living Program and that are achievable within existing program resources and any federal funds available for case management and case plan review functions for nonminor dependents, as provided for in the
 federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351). The initial adoption of emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those regulations authorized by this subdivision shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(f) The department, in consultation with representatives of the Legislature, the County Welfare Directors Association, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the Judicial Council, representatives of tribes, the
 California Youth Connection, former foster youth, child advocacy organizations, labor organizations, dependency counsel for children, juvenile justice advocacy organizations, foster caregiver organizations, and researchers, shall review and develop modifications needed to the Independent Living Program to also serve the needs of nonminor dependents, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, eligible for services pursuant to Section 11403. These modifications shall include the exit transition plan required to be completed within the 90-day period immediately prior to the date the nonminor participant attains the age that would qualify the participant for federal financial participation, as described in Section 11403, pursuant to Section 675(5)(H) of Title 42 of the United States Code. Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, through June 30, 2012, the department shall prepare for
 implementation of the applicable provisions of this section by publishing all-county letters or similar instructions from the director by October 1, 2011, to be effective January 1, 2012.

(g) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities required under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 40.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.45.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), and notwithstanding any other provision of law, services available under the Independent Living Program, established pursuant to the federal Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (Public Law 99-272), shall be provided to an otherwise eligible former dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 placed with a nonrelated legal guardian, who is receiving permanent placement services pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16508. In a county operating under a demonstration project pursuant to Section
 18260, services available under the Independent Living Program shall be provided to an otherwise eligible former dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 placed with a nonrelated legal guardian, regardless of whether the child is receiving permanent placement services. 

(b) Services provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall only be provided to an otherwise eligible former dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 placed with a nonrelated legal guardian, whose guardianship was ordered on or after the child’s eighth birthday.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 555, Sec. 1.   (SB 654)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.5.

(a) The department shall contract with an appropriate and qualified entity to conduct an evaluation of the adequacy of the current child welfare services budgeting methodology and make recommendations for revising the budgeting methodology, including appropriate caseload levels, supportive services, and preventative services, in order to accurately and adequately fund the system. This evaluation shall, at a minimum, consider the impact of the following factors on the budgeting methodology:

(1) The current state and federal statutory and regulatory environment for child welfare services.

(2) The state of the art advancements and best child welfare practice, such as family conferencing and wraparound services.

(3) The impact of the child welfare services case management system on the workload of workers in the system.

(4) The nature and degree of the problems experienced by families in need of child welfare services, and the service needs of abused and neglected children and their families.

(5) The impact on workload of obtaining timely medical, mental health, educational, and developmental assessments of children in the child welfare system, and coordinating with other systems to meet the children’s needs.

(b) The department shall convene an advisory group that shall include representatives of the County Welfare Directors Association, the California State Association of Counties, child welfare services consumers, children’s advocacy organizations, and child welfare social worker organizations. The advisory group shall do both of the following:

(1) Provide oversight over the process of selecting an entity to conduct an evaluation under subdivision (a).

(2) Provide oversight over, and technical assistance to, the entity selected to conduct the evaluation under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 239.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.6.

(a) The department, in consultation with the seven member task force specified in subdivision (b), shall develop a plan to implement the recommendations of the evaluation required by Section 10609.5.

(b) The task force created pursuant to this section shall include all of the following:

(1) The director, or his or her designee.

(2) One representative from each of the following:

(A) The Department of Finance.

(B) The County Welfare Directors Association.

(C) The California State Association of Counties.

(D) Child welfare services consumers.

(E) Children’s advocacy organizations.

(F) Child welfare social worker organizations.

(c) If participation on the task force convened pursuant to this section will cause hardship for the representative of child welfare consumers identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), the department, upon the request of the representative, shall provide reimbursement for travel and other expenses directly related to participation in the task force. Except as provided in this subdivision, no task force member shall receive compensation or any other payment for serving on the task force.

(d) The department shall submit the implementation plan to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before June 30, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 25.5.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.7.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The department has convened the Child Welfare Services Stakeholders Group for the purpose of making recommendations to redesign California’s child welfare system to create and sustain a flexible system, comprising public and private partnerships, that provides a comprehensive system of support for families and communities to ensure the well-being of every child.

(2) In the first year of the stakeholders group, there was significant attention brought to the carrying capacity of direct service professionals through the development of an implementation plan of child welfare services workload study pursuant to Section 10609.5.

(3) The stakeholders group has convened a series of working groups, including the Human Resources Workgroup, whose tasks are to develop core strategies and recommendations resulting in a high capacity, competent, satisfied child welfare services workforce able to perform the essential functions of the redesigned child welfare system.

(4) In the second year, the Human Resources Workgroup report found that workload issues have not appreciably declined and that for the child welfare services redesign to be successful, workforce considerations need to be at the forefront of all redesign efforts.

(5) The stakeholders group and its Human Resources Workgroup have entered the third year of the redesign process for the state’s child welfare services.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Human Resources Workgroup of the Child Welfare Services Stakeholders Group include in its next planned report the core strategies needed to establish minimum caseload standards under the redesigned child welfare services system for all service areas.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Human Resources Workgroup also make recommendations for implementing the new caseload standards, including a recommendation that would achieve at least 20 percent of the caseload reductions annually over a specified period of time, as required under the newly recommended standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.8.

On an annual basis, at the time of budget hearings, the State Department of Social Services shall provide information to the budget committees of the Legislature comparing the Governor’s proposed statewide budget for the child welfare services program, including the augmentation and hold harmless funds, to the caseload standards recommended by the evaluation required under Section 10609.5, updated for an analysis of cost-of-doing-business increases and to account for the use of child welfare services funding for noncase-carrying activities, based on information supplied by counties, and measured on a statewide basis. The department shall consult with representatives of the County Welfare Directors Association in the development of statewide cost-of-doing-business increases and the average proportion of expenditures on noncase-carrying activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 78, Sec. 21.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.9.

(a) (1) Funds
 designated
 for child welfare services outcome improvements shall be flexible and may be spent on local priorities identified in the county’s system improvement plan, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Reducing high worker caseloads.

(B) Clerical or paraprofessional support.

(C) Direct services to clients, such as mental health or substance abuse treatment.

(D) Prevention and early intervention services, such as differential response.

(E) Permanency and youth transition practice improvements.

(F) Any other investments to better serve children and families, which may include services to support
 older youth in foster care, such as mentoring services.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that these funds be linked to improved outcomes, and provided to counties on an ongoing basis.

(b) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 76.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.95.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall provide guidance on best practices and facilitate an exchange of information and best practices among counties on an annual basis, commencing no later than January 1, 2014, on establishing memoranda of understanding with appropriate foreign consulates for juvenile court cases in which a parent has been arrested and issued an immigration hold, has been detained by the United States Department of Homeland Security, or has been deported to his or her country of origin. This exchange of information may be accomplished by posting training and other information on the department’s Internet Web site.

(b) The memoranda of understanding shall include, but shall
 not be limited to, procedures for contacting a foreign consulate at the onset of a juvenile court case, accessing documentation for the child, locating a detained parent, facilitating family reunification once a parent has been deported to his or her country of origin, aiding the safe transfer of a child to the parent’s country of origin, and communicating with relevant departments and services in the parent’s country of origin, including, when appropriate, allowing reports from the foreign child welfare authorities documenting the parent’s living situation and the parent’s participation in service plans in the country of origin that are in compliance with the case plan requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 845, Sec. 16.   (SB 1064)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.97.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall provide guidance on best practices and facilitate an exchange of information and best practices among counties on an annual basis, commencing no later than January 1, 2014, on assisting a child in a juvenile court case who is eligible for special immigrant juvenile status under Section 1101(a)(27)(J) of Title 8 of the United States Code. This exchange of information may be accomplished by posting training and other information on the department’s Internet Web site.

(b) The guidance shall include procedures for assisting eligible children in applying for special immigrant juvenile status, before the children reach 21 years of age or get married, and
 applying for T visas, U visas, and Violence Against Women Act self-petitions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 845, Sec. 17.   (SB 1064)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.98.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall post a single page on its internet website with a list of available state resources for refugees
 and a link to the internet website of each county human assistance agency.

(b) Each county human services agency shall post a single page on its internet website with a list of available resources for refugees that may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Public transportation, including, but not limited to, schedule information and free or discounted rate
 information.

(2) Financial literacy information.

(3) Resources for establishing credit.

(4) Job orientation and training programs.

(5) Mental health services.

(6) Affordable housing and rental assistance programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 399, Sec. 1.   (SB 465)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10610.

The department may join associations of social welfare agencies having as their purpose the interchanging or supplying of information relating to the technique of social welfare administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10611.

All plans for the use of existing buildings or for new buildings, parts of buildings, or additions to or alterations in buildings, for any public institution under the supervision of the department or for any state, city, or county charitable institution (other than county hospitals and institutions under the jurisdiction of another state department) or for any privately operated institution which receives state aid for the care or support of its inmates shall, before their adoption, be submitted to the department for suggestions and approval as to the social requirements of the occupants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10612.

Two months prior to each annual session of the Legislature, the department shall make a full and complete report to the Governor of all its transactions during the preceding year, showing specifically all expenses incurred and moneys paid out by it, with suggestions and recommendations for legislative and executive action.

The department shall include in its report a complete report on its administration of appeals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10612.5.

(a) The department shall oversee
 the program for internet-based reporting of child abuse and neglect pursuant to Section 11166.02 of the Penal Code through the issuance of written directives that shall have the same force and effect as regulations. The directives shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) A county that chooses to participate in the program shall hire an evaluator to monitor the implementation of the program and submit evaluations to the State Department of Social Services during the first two years of implementation. The department may authorize additional time if needed, as determined by the department after consultation with the county, in accordance with directives issued by the department
 pursuant to subdivision (a). At a minimum, the evaluations shall address the outcome measures described in subdivision (c).

(c) In addition to any requirements set forth by the department under this section, a county that participates in the program shall, in collaboration with the County Welfare Directors Association of California and the department, develop outcome measures to determine the effectiveness of the program of the county during the duration of the program, which may include the following:

(1) The number of reports provided by telephone and any increase or decrease in the usage of telephone reports.

(2) The number of reports provided through the internet-based reporting system and any increase or
 decrease in usage of the system.

(3) Any increase or decrease in the number of emergency or nonemergency telephone reports.

(4) Any increase or decrease in the overall number of emergency or nonemergency reports.

(d) A county that participates in the program shall, within two years of the county’s implementation, provide information to the Assembly Committee on Human Services and the Senate Committee on Human Services pertaining to the effectiveness of the program based on the outcome measures developed pursuant to subdivision (c). 

(e) The department may conclude the program on a county-by-county basis if the evaluation and monitoring indicate the program is compromising the safety of children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 242, Sec. 2.   (AB 1929)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10613.

The functions of the department may include the administration and the supervision of the administration of public social services, except health care services and medical assistance, within this state as an agent of the federal government and acting as a service agency for the federal government in the field of social service and welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10614.

(a) The department shall annually submit by September 10 of each year and March 1 of the following year, to the Department of Finance for its approval, all assumptions underlying all estimates related to all of the following:

(1) Average monthly caseload for each of the categorical aid programs.

(2) Average grant for each of the categorical aid programs.

(3) Total estimated expenditures for each of the categorical aid programs.

(4) Savings or costs associated with all regulatory or statutory
 changes.
